Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1209.
do enact as follows:AB1209,11Section 1. 16.5187 of the statutes is created to read:AB1209,2,4216.5187 Transfers involving the school aid fund. Beginning in fiscal 3year 2025-26, the secretary shall transfer from the general fund to the school aid 4fund the amount specified under s. 25.492.AB1209,25Section 2. 20.255 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1209,3,2620.255 (2) (b) Aids for special education and school age parents programs. The 7amounts in the schedule A sum sufficient for the payment of the full cost of special 8education for children in hospitals and convalescent homes under s. 115.88 (4) and 1for the payment of aids for special education and school age parents programs 2under ss. 115.88, 115.93 and 118.255 as provided under s. 115.882.AB1209,33Section 3. 20.255 (2) (ks) of the statutes is created to read:AB1209,3,6420.255 (2) (ks) Supplemental school aid. From the school aid fund, all moneys 5transferred to the school fund under s. 16.5187 in the previous fiscal year for 6supplemental school aid under s. 121.24.AB1209,47Section 4. 25.17 (1) (om) of the statutes is created to read:AB1209,3,8825.17 (1) (om) School aid fund (s. 25.492);AB1209,59Section 5. 25.492 of the statutes is created to read:AB1209,3,131025.492 School aid fund. There is established a separate nonlapsible trust 11fund designated as the school aid fund to consist of an amount transferred from the 12general fund that is equal to the amount determined annually by the department of 13revenue under s. 73.03 (78).AB1209,614Section 6. 71.06 (1r) (d) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, 15is amended to read:AB1209,3,181671.06 (1r) (d) On all taxable income exceeding $323,290, 7.65 but not 17exceeding $750,000, 8.65 percent, except that for taxable years beginning after 18December 31, 2025, 8.85 percent.AB1209,719Section 7. 71.06 (1r) (e) of the statutes is created to read:AB1209,3,212071.06 (1r) (e) On all taxable income exceeding $750,000, 17.30 percent, except 21that for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, 17.70 percent.AB1209,822Section 8. 71.06 (2) (k) 4. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2315, is amended to read:AB1209,4,22471.06 (2) (k) 4. On all taxable income exceeding $431,060, 7.65 but not 1exceeding $1,000,000 8.65 percent, except that for taxable years beginning after 2December 31, 2025, 8.85 percent.AB1209,93Section 9. 71.06 (2) (k) 5. of the statutes is created to read:AB1209,4,5471.06 (2) (k) 5. On all taxable income exceeding $1,000,000, 17.30 percent, 5except that for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, 17.70 percent.AB1209,106Section 10. 71.06 (2) (L) 4. of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 715, is amended to read:AB1209,4,10871.06 (2) (L) 4. On all taxable income exceeding $215,530, 7.65 but not 9exceeding $500,000 8.65 percent, except that for taxable years beginning after 10December 31, 2025, 8.85 percent.AB1209,1111Section 11. 71.06 (2) (L) 5. of the statutes is created to read:AB1209,4,131271.06 (2) (L) 5. On all taxable income exceeding $500,000, 17.30 percent, 13except that for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, 17.70 percent.AB1209,1214Section 12. 71.07 (7) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1209,4,221571.07 (7) (c) The total credits under par. (b) 1. and 2. may not exceed an 16amount determined by multiplying the taxpayer’s net Wisconsin income tax by a 17ratio derived by dividing the income subject to tax in the other state that is also 18subject to tax in Wisconsin while the taxpayer is a resident of Wisconsin, by the 19taxpayer’s Wisconsin adjusted gross income. The credit under par. (b) 3. may not 20exceed an amount determined by multiplying the income subject to tax in the other 21state that is also subject to tax in Wisconsin by 7.9 percent the applicable rate in s. 2271.27 for the taxable year.AB1209,1323Section 13. 71.21 (6) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 71.21 (6) (a) (intro.) 24and amended to read:AB1209,5,7171.21 (6) (a) (intro.) If persons who, on the day on which an election under this 2paragraph is made, hold more than 50 percent of the capital and profits of a 3partnership consent, a partnership that is a partnership for federal income tax 4purposes may elect, on or before the due date or extended due date of its return 5under this chapter, to be taxed at the entity level at a the applicable rate of 7.9 6percent in s. 71.27 for the taxable year of net income reportable to this state as 7described in par. (d) 1. for that taxable year.AB1209,148Section 14. 71.23 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1209,6,4971.23 (2) Franchise tax. For the privilege of exercising its franchise, buying 10or selling lottery prizes if the winning tickets were originally bought in this state or 11doing business in this state in a corporate capacity, except as provided under sub. 12(3), every domestic or foreign corporation, except corporations specified in s. 71.26 13(1), and every nuclear decommissioning trust or reserve fund shall annually pay a 14franchise tax according to or measured by its entire Wisconsin net income of the 15preceding taxable year at the rate for the taxable year set forth in s. 71.27 (2). In 16addition, except as provided in sub. (3) and s. 71.26 (1), a corporation that ceases 17doing business in this state and a nuclear decommissioning trust or reserve fund 18that is terminated shall pay a special franchise tax according to or measured by its 19entire Wisconsin net income for the taxable year during which the corporation 20ceases doing business in this state or the nuclear decommissioning trust or reserve 21fund is terminated at the rates rate for the taxable year under s. 71.27 (2). Every 22corporation organized under the laws of this state shall be deemed to be residing 23within this state for the purposes of this franchise tax. All provisions of this 24chapter and ch. 73 relating to income taxation of corporations shall apply to 1franchise taxes imposed under this subsection, unless the context requires 2otherwise. The tax imposed by this subsection on national banking associations 3shall be in lieu of all taxes imposed by this state on national banking associations to 4the extent it is not permissible to tax such associations under federal law.AB1209,155Section 15. 71.27 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 71.27 (1) (a) and 6amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1209 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1209 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1209 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1209 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1209: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting